Massachusetts, session 194th, H1388.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The division of medical assistance, under authority granted in section 12 of chapter 118E
of Massachusetts general laws, shall amend the Massachusetts long term care regulations (130
CMR 456.431). Such amendment shall increase the maximum temporary absence for
nonmedical leave paid for by MassHealth, from ten days to fourteen days.
of 1